Vermont, session 2025-2026, S114.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 316 is amended to read:
§ 316. ACCESS TO PUBLIC RECORDS AND DOCUMENTS
(a) Inspection during hours of operation. Any person may inspect or copy
any public record of a public agency, as follows:
(1) For any agency, board, department, commission, committee, branch,
instrumentality, or authority of the State, a person may inspect a public record
on any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, between the
VT LEG #381358 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.114
2025 Page 2 of 6
hours of nine o’clock and 12 o’clock in the forenoon and between one o’clock
and four o’clock in the afternoon.
(2) For any agency, board, committee, department, instrumentality,
commission, or authority of a political subdivision of the State, a person may
inspect a public record during customary business hours.
(b) Charges for use of equipment and mailing. If copying equipment
maintained for use by a public agency is used by the agency to copy the public
record or document requested, the agency may charge and collect from the
person requesting the copy the actual cost of providing the copy. The agency
may also charge and collect from the person making the request, the costs
associated with mailing or transmitting the record by facsimile or other
electronic means. Nothing in this section shall exempt any person from paying
fees otherwise established by law for obtaining copies of public records or
documents, but if such fee is established for the copy, no additional costs or
fees shall be charged.
(c) Charges for staff time associated with inspection or copying. Unless
otherwise provided by law, in the following instances an agency may also
charge and collect the cost of staff time associated with complying with a
request for a to inspect or copy of a public record: (1) the time directly
involved in complying with the request exceeds 30 minutes; (2) the agency
agrees to create a public record; or (3) the agency agrees to provide the public
VT LEG #381358 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.114
2025 Page 3 of 6
record in a nonstandard format and the time directly involved in complying
with the request exceeds 30 minutes. The agency may require that requests
subject to staff time charges under this subsection be made in writing and that
all charges be paid, in whole or in part, prior to delivery of the making the
records available for inspection or delivering copies of the records. Upon
request, the agency shall provide an estimate of the charge.
(d) Secretary of State; uniform schedule of public records charges. The
Secretary of State, after consultation with the Secretary of Administration,
shall establish the actual cost of providing a copy of a public record that may
be charged by State agencies. The Secretary shall also establish the amount
that may be charged for staff time spent complying with a request to copy or
inspect a record, when such a the charge is authorized under this section. To
determine “actual cost,” the Secretary shall consider the following only: the
cost of the paper or the electronic media onto which a public record is copied,
a prorated amount for maintenance and replacement of the machine or
equipment used to copy the record, and any utility charges directly associated
with copying a record. The Secretary of State shall adopt, by rule, a uniform
schedule of public record charges for State agencies.
(e) Political subdivisions; schedule of charges. After public hearing, the
legislative body of a political subdivision shall establish actual cost charges for
copies of public records. The legislative body shall also establish the amount
VT LEG #381358 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.114
2025 Page 4 of 6
that may be charged for staff time spent complying with a request to copy or
inspect a record, when such a the charge is authorized under this section. To
determine actual cost charges, the legislative body shall use the same factors
used by the Secretary of State. If a legislative body fails to establish a uniform
schedule of charges, the charges for that political subdivision shall be the
uniform schedule of charges established by the Secretary of State until the
local legislative body establishes such a schedule. A schedule of public
records charges shall be posted in prominent locations in the town offices.
(f) State agencies; collection and deposit of monies. State agencies shall
provide receipts for all monies received under this section. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, a State agency may retain monies
collected under this section to the extent such the charges represent the actual
cost incurred to provide copies or for staff time spent complying with a
request to copy or inspect a record under this subchapter section. Amounts
collected by a State agency under this section for the cost of staff time
associated with providing copies shall be deposited in the General Fund, unless
another disposition or use of revenues received by that agency is specifically
authorized by law. Charges collected under this section shall be deposited in
the agency’s operating account or the General Fund, as appropriate, on a
monthly basis or whenever the amount totals $100.00, whichever occurs first.
VT LEG #381358 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.114
2025 Page 5 of 6
(g) Use of public agency equipment. A public agency having the
equipment necessary to copy its public records shall utilize its equipment to
produce copies. If the public agency does not have such equipment, nothing in
this section shall be construed to require the public agency to provide or
arrange for copying service, to use or permit the use of copying equipment
other than its own, to permit operation of its copying equipment by other than
its own personnel, to permit removal of the public record by the requesting
person for purposes of copying, or to make its own personnel available for
making handwritten or typed copies of the public record or document
requested.
(h) Standard formats. Standard formats for copies of public records shall
be as follows: for copies in paper form, a photocopy of a paper public record
or a hard copy print-out of a public record maintained in electronic form; for
copies in electronic form, the format in which the record is maintained. Any
format other than the formats described in this subsection is a nonstandard
format.
(i) Duty to provide electronic records in standard format. If an agency
maintains public records in an electronic format, nonexempt public records
shall be available for copying in either the standard electronic format or the
standard paper format, as designated by the party requesting the records. If
requested by the party requesting the records, an agency may, but is not
VT LEG #381358 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.114
2025 Page 6 of 6
required to, provide copies of public records in a nonstandard format, create a
public record, or convert paper public records to electronic format.
(j) Rules. A public agency may make reasonable rules to prevent
disruption of operations, to preserve the security of public records or
documents, and to protect them from damage.
(k) Hazardous waste information; federal law shall govern. Information
concerning facilities and sites for the treatment, storage, and disposal of
hazardous waste shall be made available to the public under this subchapter in
substantially the same manner and to the same degree as such information is
made available under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as
amended, 42 U.S.C. chapter 82, subchapter 3, and the Federal Freedom of
Information Act, 5 U.S.C. section § 552 et seq. In the event of a conflict
between the provisions of this subchapter and the cited federal laws, federal
law shall govern.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381358 v.1